Louisiana, session 2026, HB230.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 51:1430 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1430. Disclosure of artificial intelligence-generated content
A. For purposes of this Section:
(1) "Artificial intelligence" has the same meaning as provided in R.S.
14:73.14.
(2) "Artificial intelligence system" means a machine-based system that is
designed to operate with varying levels of autonomy that infers, from the input it
receives, how to generate outputs such as predictions, content, recommendations, or
decisions that can influence physical or virtual environments.
B. Any artificial intelligence system that produces images, videos, audio, or
multimedia artificial intelligence-generated content shall include on such artificial
intelligence-generated content a clear and conspicuous disclosure that identifies the
content as generated by artificial intelligence.
C. A violation of this Section is a deceptive and unfair trade practice and
subjects the violator to a civil fine of up to ten thousand dollars per violation
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-296 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 230
enforceable by the attorney general by filing a civil enforcement action in a court of
competent jurisdiction.